zh-CN: 篮球框铁环配件类型: 锚定套件; 篮板清洁系统; 投篮回球系统; 曲柄/驱动器手柄; 篮筐照明灯; 安装支架; 立柱保护垫; 备件; 安全带; 负重/配重袋; 其他
en: Basketball hoop accessory type: Anchor kit; Backboard cleaning system; Ball return system; Crank/actuator handle; Hoop light; Mounting bracket; Pole pad; Replacement part; Safety strap; Weight/ballast bag; Other
fr: Type d’accessoire pour panier de basket-ball: Kit d’ancrage; Système de nettoyage de panneau; Système de retour de ballon; Manivelle/poignée d’actionneur; Éclairage de panier; Support de montage; Coussin de poteau; Pièce de rechange; Sangle de sécurité; Sac de lestage/poids; Autre
cs: Typ příslušenství k basketbalovému koši: Kotvicí sada; Systém na čištění desky; Systém vracení míče; Klika / rukojeť mechanismu; Osvětlení obruče; Montážní držák; Polstrování tyče; Náhradní díl; Bezpečnostní popruh; Zátěžový vak; Jiné
it: Tipo di accessorio per canestro da basket: Kit di ancoraggio; Sistema di pulizia del tabellone; Sistema di ritorno palla; Manovella/Attuatore; Luce del canestro; Staffa di montaggio; Imbottitura palo; Pezzo di ricambio; Cinghia di sicurezza; Sacco pesi/zavorra; Altro
lt-LT: Krepšinio lanko aksesuarų daikto tipas: Tvirtinimo rinkinys; Lentos valymo sistema; Kamuolio grąžinimo sistema; Sukimo / reguliavimo rankena; Lanko apšvietimas; Tvirtinimo laikiklis; Stovo apsauga; Atsarginė dalis; Saugos diržas; Svorių / balasto krepšys; Kita
ko: 농구 골대 액세서리 유형: 앵커 키트; 백보드 청소 시스템; 볼 리턴 시스템; 크랭크/액추에이터 핸들; 골대 조명; 장착 브래킷; 폴 패드; 교체 부품; 안전 스트랩; 웨이트/안정기 백; 기타
sk-SK: Typ príslušenstva basketbalového koša: Upevňovacia súprava; Systém na čistenie dosky; Systém vracania lôpt; Kľuka/ovládacia páka; Osvetlenie koša; Montážny držiak; Ochrana tyče; Náhradný diel; Bezpečnostný popruh; Závažie/zaťažovacie vrece; Iné
tr: Basketbol potası aksesuar tipi: Sabitleme kiti; Panya temizleme sistemi; Top dönüş sistemi; Krank/aktüatör kolu; Çember ışığı; Montaj braketi; Direk pedi; Yedek parça; Emniyet kayışı; Ağırlık/denge çantası; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de acessório para cesto de basquetebol: Kit de fixação; Sistema de limpeza da tabela; Sistema de devolução de bolas; Manivela/alavanca atuadora; Luz do cesto; Suporte de montagem; Proteção do poste; Peça de substituição; Correia de segurança; Saco de peso/lastro; Outro
ja: バスケットボールフープ用アクセサリータイプ: アンカーキット; バックボードクリーニングシステム; ボールリターンシステム; クランク/アクチュエーターハンドル; フープライト; 取り付けブラケット; ポールパッド; 交換部品; 安全ストラップ; 重り/バラストバッグ; その他
es: Tipo de accesorio para aro de baloncesto: Kit de anclaje; Sistema de limpieza del tablero; Sistema de retorno de la pelota; Manivela/mango actuador; Luz para aro; Soporte de montaje; Almohadilla para poste; Pieza de repuesto; Correa de seguridad; Bolsa de peso/lastre; Otro
ru: Тип аксессуара для баскетбольного кольца: Комплект анкеров; Система очистки щита; Система возврата мяча; Рукоятка привода / кривошипа; Подсветка кольца; Монтажный кронштейн; Подушка для стойки; Запасная деталь; Ремень безопасности; Мешок с утяжелителем / балластом; Другое
sv: Typ av basketkorgstillbehör: Förankringskit; Rengöringssystem för plank; Bollretursystem; Vev-/ställdonshandtag; Korgbelysning; Monteringsfäste; Stolpskydd; Reservdel; Säkerhetsrem; Vikt-/barlastsäck; Övrigt
zh-TW: 籃框配件類型: 錨定套件; 籃板清潔系統; 投籃回球機; 曲柄/致動器手柄; 籃框燈; 安裝支架; 柱墊; 替換零件; 安全帶; 加重/配重袋; 其他
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์เสริมของห่วงบาสเกตบอล: ชุดสมอบก; ระบบทำความสะอาดแป้นบาส; ระบบส่งลูกคืน; คันหมุน/คันโยก; ไฟห่วงแป้นบาส; แป้นยึด; นวมหุ้มเสา; อะไหล่เปลี่ยน; สายรัดนิรภัย; ถุงถ่วงน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de accesoriu pentru inelul de baschet: Kit de ancorare; Sistem de curățare a panoului; Sistem de returnare a mingii; Manivelă/mâner de acționare; Lumină pentru inel; Suport de montare; Protecție pentru stâlp; Piesă de schimb; Curea de siguranță; Sac de greutate/balast; Altele
pl: Typ akcesorium do obręczy koszykarskiej: Zestaw kotwiący; System czyszczenia tablicy; System zwrotu piłki; Korba/uchwyt siłownika; Oświetlenie obręczy; Wspornik montażowy; Osłona słupa; Część zamienna; Pasek zabezpieczający; Worek balastowy/obciążeniowy; Inny
hr-HR: Vrsta dodatka za košarkaški koš: Komplet za sidrenje; Sustav za čišćenje table; Sustav za vraćanje lopte; Ručica za podizanje/spuštanje; Svjetlo za obruč; Nosač za montažu; Obloga za šipku; Zamjenski dio; Sigurnosni pojas; Vreća za utege/balast; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de acessório para cesta de basquete: Kit de ancoragem; Sistema de limpeza da tabela; Sistema de retorno de bola; Manivela/alavanca de atuador; Iluminação do aro; Suporte de montagem; Protetor de poste; Peça de reposição; Cinta de segurança; Bolsa de peso/lastro; Outros
da: Basketballkurvens tilbehørstype: Forankringssæt; Rengøringssystem til plade; System til boldreturnering; Håndsving/aktuatorhåndtag; Kurvelys; Monteringsbeslag; Stangpolstring; Reservedel; Sikkerhedsstrop; Vægt/ballastpose; Andet
bg-BG: Вид аксесоар за баскетболен кош: Комплект за закрепване; Система за почистване на таблото; Система за връщане на топката; Манивела/дръжка на задвижващия механизъм; Осветление за кош; Монтажна скоба; Протектор за стълб; Резервна част; Предпазна лента; Торба с тежест/баласт; Друго
fi: Koripallokorin lisävarusteen tyyppi: Ankkurointisarja; Taustalevyn puhdistusjärjestelmä; Pallon palautusjärjestelmä; Kampi/säätökahva; Korin valo; Kiinnike; Tolpan pehmuste; Varaosa; Turvahihna; Painopussi; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta dodatka za košarkarski koš: Komplet za pritrjevanje; Sistem za čiščenje table; Sistem za vračanje žog; Ročica/ročaj mehanizma; Luč za obroč; Montažni nosilec; Oblazinjenje stebra; Nadomestni del; Varnostni trak; Vreča za obtežitev/balast; Drugo
hu: Kosárlabdapalánk tartozék típusa: Rögzítőkészlet; Palánktisztító rendszer; Labdavisszaadó rendszer; Hajtókar/mozgatókar; Palánkvilágítás; Rögzítőkonzol; Rúdvédő szivacs; Cserealkatrész; Biztonsági pánt; Súly/nehezék táska; Egyéb
el: Τύπος αξεσουάρ στεφάνης μπάσκετ: Κιτ αγκύρωσης; Σύστημα καθαρισμού ταμπλό; Σύστημα επιστροφής μπάλας; Μανιβέλα / λαβή ενεργοποιητή; Φως στεφάνης; Βραχίονας στήριξης; Προστατευτικό στρώμα στύλου; Ανταλλακτικό; Ιμάντας ασφαλείας; Τσάντα βάρους / έρματος; Άλλο
vi: Loại phụ kiện vòng bóng rổ: Bộ neo; Hệ thống làm sạch bảng rổ; Hệ thống trả bóng; Tay quay/tay kéo; Đèn vành rổ; Giá đỡ; Tấm đệm cột; Bộ phận thay thế; Dây đeo an toàn; Túi tạ/bao gia trọng; Khác
nb: Type basketballkurvtilbehør: Forankringssett; Rengjøringssystem for bakplate; Ballretursystem; Sveiv / håndtak for aktuator; Kurvlys; Monteringsbrakett; Stangbeskyttelse; Reservedel; Sikkerhetsstropp; Vekt/ballastpose; Annet
nl: Basketbalring accessoiretype: Verankeringsset; Backboard-reinigingssysteem; Balretoursysteem; Slinger/hendel; Ringverlichting; Montagebeugel; Paalkussen; Vervangend onderdeel; Veiligheidsriem; Gewichts-/ballastzak; Overig
de: Zubehörtyp für Basketballkörbe: Verankerungs-Set; Backboard-Reinigungssystem; Ballrückgabesystem; Handkurbel; Korbbeleuchtung; Halterung; Mastpolster; Ersatzteil; Sicherheitsgurt; Gewicht/Ballastsack; Sonstige